src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON OADÁDAGÁ !!= @CODE@ Plural forms of words like tjerastahka with short compound-form
                                 +Cmp/SgNom:ak%>               R        ;
                        +Cmp/Long+Cmp/SgNom:ahka%>             R        ;
                                 +Cmp/PlGen:ahka%>Q1j          R        ;
                                    +Pl+Nom:ahka%>Q1           K-VOW        ;
                                    +Pl+Gen:ahka%>Q1j          K-CONS       ;
                                    +Pl+Acc:ahka%>Q1jt         K-CONS       ;
                                    +Pl+Ill:ahka%>Q1jda        K-VOW        ;
                                    +Pl+Ine:ahka%>Q1jn         K-CONS       ;
                                    +Pl+Ela:ahka%>Q1js         K-CONS       ;
                                    +Pl+Com:ahka%>Q1j          K-CONS       ;
                                    +Pl+Nom:ahka%>Q1           PxNomPlV ; !
                                    +Pl+Gen:ahka%>Q1j%>        PxC      ; !
                                    +Pl+Acc:ahka%>Q1jd%>       PxC      ; !
                                    +Pl+Ill:ahka%>Q1jdis%>     PxCs     ; !
                                    +Pl+Ine:ahka%>Q1jn%>       PxC      ; !
                                    +Pl+Ela:ahka%>Q1jst%>      PxC      ; !
                                    +Pl+Com:ahka%>Q1j%>        PxC      ; !
                                       +Ess:ahka%>n            K-CONS       ;
                              +Err/Infl+Abe:ahka%>Q1dak        K-CONS       ; !Not sure this is possible
                              +Err/Infl+Abe:ahka%>Q1da         K-VOW        ; !Not sure this is possible
                                           :ahka%>Q1           DAGI_PLURAL        ;
                            +Der2+Der/Dimin:ahka»X7tji%>       DAGI_PLURAL        ;
                            +Der1+Der/Car+A:ahka»Q1            DIBME    ;
                       +Der1+Der/Car+A+Attr:ahka»Q1dis%>       ATTR     ;
!                           +Der1+Der/Car+A:ahka»Q1dis         VUOHTA   ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
                            +Der1+Der/Car+A:ahka»Q1d           DUVVAT   ;
!                           +Der4+Der/ahtes:ahka»Q1g           AHTES    ;
!                           +Der4+Der/ahtes:»                  AHTES    ;
                   +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:ahka»X7tja         K-VOW        ;
                   +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:ahka»X7tjij        K-CONS       ;
                   +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:ahka»X7tjijt       K-CONS       ;
                   +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:ahka»X7tjijda      K-VOW        ;
                   +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:ahka»X7tjijn       K-CONS       ;
                   +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:ahka»X7tjijs       K-CONS       ;
                   +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:ahka»X7tjij        K-CONS       ;
                      +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:ahka»X7tjin        K-CONS       ;
!                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:ahka»X7tjijd%>     PxCs     ; !
!                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:ahka»X7tjijn%>     PxCs     ; !
!                  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:ahka»X7tjijst%>    PxCs     ; !
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:ahka»X7tja»ttja    K-VOW        ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:ahka»X7tja»ttjaj   K-CONS       ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:ahka»X7tja»ttjajt  K-CONS       ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:ahka»X7tja»ttjajda K-VOW        ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:ahka»X7tja»ttjajn  K-CONS       ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:ahka»X7tja»ttjajs  K-CONS       ; !Dobbel diminutiv
  +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:ahka»X7tja»ttjaj   K-CONS       ; !Dobbel diminutiv
     +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:ahka»X7tja»ttjin   K-CONS       ; !Dobbel diminutiv

!!€gt-norm: látjádagá # Even-syllable test
!!€ látjádagá:                 látjádagá+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ látjádagájs:               látjádagá+N+Pl+Ela
