src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
látjádagá+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Obj-clo:látjád OADÁDAGÁ ;
oadádagá+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Obj-clo:oadád OADÁDAGÁ ;
